Utah statutes.
41-3-508.   Special plates -- Suspension or revocation -- Grounds -- Procedure -- Appeal -- Confiscation.

(1)  The division may suspend or revoke the special plate or plates issued to a dealer, dismantler, manufacturer, remanufacturer, or transporter if it determines that the person:

(a)  is not lawfully entitled to them;

(b)  has made or knowingly permitted illegal use of the plates;

(c)  has committed fraud in the registration of motor vehicles; or

(d)  failed to give notices of sales or transfers required under this chapter.

(2) (a)  Suspension or revocation of special plates takes effect immediately upon written notification to the licensee by the division.

(b)  Upon notification, the licensee shall immediately return all special plates to the division.

(c)  Failure to return the plates or permitting their continued use is a violation of this chapter.

(3) (a)  If a licensee desires to appeal the division's suspension or revocation, he shall file a written notice of appeal with the administrator within 10 days of the suspension or revocation.

(b)  Upon receipt of the notice, the administrator shall schedule a hearing for not more than 20 days from the date the written appeal is received.

(c)  The licensee may not continue to use or possess any special plates that have been suspended or revoked.

(d)  The hearing and subsequent appeal process are in accordance with the procedures in this chapter.

(4) (a)  A peace officer may confiscate any special plate that he has reason to believe is being used illegally.

(b)  A special plate confiscated under this chapter or Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, may not be returned to the licensee if the administrator determines that the plate was being used illegally.

